District of Columbia statutes.
24-615

Donations.

The Mayor may accept on behalf of the District of Columbia donations of services or gifts of real or personal property, tangible or intangible, which are made for the purpose of carrying out his functions under this subchapter. Gifts of money and the proceeds from the liquidation of any other gift shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia as established in the Revenue Funds Availability Act of 1975. The Mayor shall use such donations and gifts to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Aug. 4, 1947, ch. 472, § 15
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 624, Pub. L. 90-452, § 3(a)
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 5(b), 22 DCR 6316

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-535.
1973 Ed., § 24-535.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.